Utah statutes.
79-2-203.   Policy board members.
(1)  Members of a policy board within the department shall be appointed
consistent with the following criteria:
(a)  geographical distribution;
(b)  expertise or personal experience with subject matter;
(c)  diversity of opinion and political preference; and
(d)  gender, cultural, and ethnic representation.
(2)  The governor may remove a member at any time for official misconduct,
habitual or willful neglect of duty, or for other good and sufficient cause.
(3)  No member of the Legislature may serve as a member of a division policy
board.
(4) (a)  In addition to the disclosures required by Section 67-16-7, a board
member shall disclose any conflict of interest to the board.
(b)  Notwithstanding Section 67-16-9, a board member with a substantial
conflict may serve on the board if the member refrains from voting on a board
action when the conflict involves:
(i)  a direct financial interest in the subject under consideration; or
(ii)  an entity or asset that could be substantially affected by the outcome
of board action.
